District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Utility Rates and Ratemaking Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Paragraph 2 of section 8 of Chapter 150 of An Act Making appropriations to
provide for the expenses of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June Thirtieth,
nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 977;
D.C. Code §34-1101), is amended as follows:
(a) A new section 923 is added to read as follows:


"Sec. 923. Rates and Ratemaking.
"(a) Unless otherwise authorized by law, the Commission may approve the use of a
multiyear rate plan for the distribution of base rates only if the plan:
"(1) Sets the proposed base rates on the basis of actual historic costs with
allowance for adjustments to reflect known and measurable changes in costs for the rate effective
period;
"(2) Does not allow for the public utility to file for reconciliation of cost or
revenue variances of the approved revenue component used by the Commission to establish just
and reasonable rates;
"(3) Clearly defines a mechanism for returning, refunding, or crediting any excess
return on equity to customers within a specified timeframe after the conclusion of the rate plan;
"(4) Provides a quantitative cost-benefit analysis demonstrating how ratepayers
can expect to see positive monetary net benefits of the investment;
"(A) The cost-benefit analysis shall include a summary of available
alternatives, and a description of why those alternatives were not pursued, in order to aid the
Commission's prudency review.
"(B) All non-confidential models, assumptions, and supporting data used
to justify a multiyear rate plan shall be made publicly available in the Commission's docket."
"(b)(1) For a gas company to recover costs associated with eligible infrastructure
replacement projects, a plan shall demonstrate:
"(A) A quantitative cost-benefit analysis demonstrating how ratepayers
can expect to see positive net benefits of the investments; and


"(B) That the gas company has analyzed available cost-effective options to
defer, reduce, or remove the need to replace, construct, or upgrade components of the gas
company's distribution infrastructure, including leak detection and repair.
"(2) In a base rate proceeding after approval of a plan, the Commission shall, in
establishing a gas company's revenue requirements, take into account any benefits the gas
company realized as a result of a surcharge approved under the plan.".
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).